Maryland, session 2025, SB0538.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
SUBTITLE 3A. INTERSTATE DENTAL AND DENTAL HYGIENE LICENSURE
COMPACT.
4–3A–01.
THE INTERSTATE DENTAL AND DENTAL HYGIENE LICENSURE COMPACT IS
HEREBY ENACTED INTO LAW AND THE GOVERNOR SHALL ENTER INTO A COMPACT
ON BEHALF OF THE STATE OF MARYLAND WITH ANY JURISDICTION LEGALLY
JOINED THEREIN, IN THE FORM SUBSTANTIALLY AS SET FORTH IN THIS ACT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0538*

SENATE BILL 538
SECTION 1. PURPOSE
THIS COMPACT SHALL BE KNOWN AS THE INTERSTATE DENTAL AND DENTAL
HYGIENE LICENSURE COMPACT AND THE PURPOSE OF THE COMPACT IS TO
EXPEDITE LICENSURE AND INCREASE ACCESS TO DENTAL HEALTH CARE THROUGH
LICENSURE BOARDS ACTING IN COOPERATION. THE COMPACT ADOPTS THE
EXISTING STRUCTURES MOST UTILIZED BY DENTAL BOARDS ACROSS THE UNITED
STATES, WHILE ENSURING THE SAFETY OF THE PUBLIC THROUGH THE SHARING OF
DOCUMENTS AND INFORMATION. THIS COMPACT ENSURES THAT EACH STATE
RETAINS THE RIGHT TO IMPOSE AN ADVERSE ACTION ON A LICENSEE AS A HOME
STATE OR AS A PRACTICING STATE. EACH STATE HAS AN OPPORTUNITY TO SHARE
INVESTIGATIONS AND INFORMATION WITH THE HOME STATE OF LICENSURE. THE
COMPACT IS OPERATED BY STATE DENTAL BOARD MEMBERS, ADMINISTRATORS
AND OTHER STAFF, THUS ALLOWING FOR EACH STATE TO MAINTAIN ITS
SOVEREIGNTY.
THE COMPACT:
(A) ALLOWS FOR EXPEDITED LICENSURE PORTABILITY AND EASE OF
MOVEMENT OF LICENSEES BETWEEN STATES;
(B) ALLOWS EACH STATE TO CONTINUE TO REGULATE THE PRACTICE OF
DENTISTRY AND DENTAL HYGIENE WITHIN ITS BORDERS;
(C) CREATES A COMMON GOAL OF PROTECTING THE PUBLIC BY ENSURING
A UNIFORM LICENSURE STANDARD AND SHARING OF INFORMATION IN THE
COMPACT;
(D) ALLOWS FOR LICENSURE IN EVERY PARTICIPATING STATE BY
REQUIRING PASSAGE OF THE UNIFORM LICENSURE EXAMINATION THAT ASSESSES
PSYCHOMOTOR AND COGNITIVE DENTAL SKILLS AND IS CURRENTLY ACCEPTED IN
FIFTY (50) STATE LICENSING JURISDICTIONS AND UNITED STATES TERRITORIES;
(E) GIVES LICENSEES ONE (1) LOCATION TO MAINTAIN PROFESSIONAL
DOCUMENTATION TO EXPEDITE LICENSE TRANSFERS IN STATES, HOSPITALS OR
INSTITUTIONAL CREDENTIALING;
(F) FACILITATES A FASTER LICENSURE PROCESS FOR RELOCATION OR
SEPARATION OF MILITARY MEMBERS AND THEIR DEPENDENT SPOUSES; THERE ARE
NO COMPACT FEES FOR MILITARY MEMBERS OR THEIR SPOUSES;

SENATE BILL 538 3
(G) ALLEVIATES A DUPLICATIVE PROCESS FOR LICENSURE AMONG
MULTIPLE STATES; AND
(H) SAVES APPLICANTS MONEY BY NOT HAVING TO OBTAIN DUPLICATE
DOCUMENTS FROM A SOURCE THAT CHARGES FOR THE DOCUMENTS.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
(A) “AADB” MEANS THE AMERICAN ASSOCIATION OF DENTAL BOARDS
(AADB) OR ITS NAMED SUCCESSOR, FORMERLY KNOWN AS THE AMERICAN
ASSOCIATION OF DENTAL EXAMINERS (AADE), ORIGINALLY CHARTERED ON
SEPTEMBER 10TH, 1896 AND RENEWED IN 1944, COMPRISING STATE DENTAL
BOARDS IN THE UNITED STATES AND ITS TERRITORIES;
(B) “ATTORNEYS’ COMMITTEE” MEANS THE COMMITTEE OF ATTORNEYS
WHO CURRENTLY REPRESENT A MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD; THE ATTORNEYS’
COMMITTEE SHALL DESIGNATE ONE OF ITS MEMBERS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
COMMISSION AS A NON–VOTING MEMBER. AN ATTORNEY THAT HAS PREVIOUSLY
SERVED AS AN ATTORNEY FOR A MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD MAY BE INVITED
ON A YEAR–TO–YEAR BASIS TO SERVE ON THE ATTORNEYS’ COMMITTEE IF THEY
HAVE NOT ENGAGED IN AN OFFICIAL CASE AGAINST A STATE DENTAL BOARD OR
HAVE ANY OTHER CONFLICT OF INTEREST. THE ATTORNEYS’ COMMITTEE MAY
ASSIST THE INVESTIGATORS IN WORKING THROUGH JOINT INVESTIGATION ISSUES
BETWEEN STATES;
(C) “ACTIVE–DUTY MILITARY PERSON OR SPOUSE” MEANS A LICENSEE IN
FULL–TIME ACTIVE–DUTY STATUS IN THE ACTIVE UNIFORMED SERVICES OF THE
UNITED STATES, INCLUDING MEMBERS OF THE NATIONAL GUARD AND RESERVES.
THE LEGAL SPOUSE OF THE MILITARY MEMBER MUST BE RECOGNIZED BY THE
MILITARY UNIT AS A DEPENDENT WHILE THE SERVICE MEMBER IS ON ACTIVE DUTY.
SPOUSES SHALL RECEIVE THE SAME PRIVILEGES AS MILITARY MEMBERS FOR THE
PURPOSE OF THIS COMPACT;
(D) “ACTIVE INVESTIGATION” MEANS AN ACTIVE INVESTIGATION
POTENTIALLY RESULTING IN FORMAL ALLEGATIONS OR CHARGES PRECIPITATING
A JUDICIAL PROCESS BY A STATE DENTAL BOARD, OVERSIGHT AGENCY, OR OTHER
LAW ENFORCEMENT ENTITY;
(E) “ADVERSE ACTION” MEANS AN ORDER ISSUED BY A STATE DENTAL
BOARD OR REPORTED TO THE CLEARINGHOUSE PURSUANT TO THE COMMISSION’S
BYLAWS AND RULES THAT DISCIPLINES A LICENSEE. ADVERSE ACTION INCLUDES,
AND IS NOT LIMITED TO, THE SUSPENSION, LIMITING, OR REVOCATION OF A
LICENSE OR COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE; THE IMPOSITION OF FEES AND

SENATE BILL 538
SANCTIONS; AND ANY TEMPORARY EMERGENCY ORDER THAT MAY BE LATER
WITHDRAWN BY A BOARD;
(F) “ADEX EXAMINATION” MEANS THE INITIAL LICENSURE EXAMINATIONS
DEVELOPED BY THE AMERICAN BOARD OF DENTAL EXAMINERS, INC. OR ITS
SUCCESSOR;
(G) “BYLAWS” MEANS THE BYLAWS PASSED BY THE COMMISSION OR ITS
NAMED SUCCESSOR COMMISSION;
(H) “CLEARINGHOUSE” MEANS THE CLEARINGHOUSE AND DATABANK THAT
HOUSES PRIOR ADVERSE ACTION DOCUMENTATIONS, ORDERS, AND DENIALS OF
LICENSURE OR PERMITS FROM STATE DENTAL BOARDS THAT IS ADMINISTERED BY
THE AADB OR ITS SUCCESSOR;
(I) “CODA” MEANS THE COMMISSION ON DENTAL ACCREDITATION OR ITS
SUCCESSOR AS APPROVED BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION;
(J) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE INTERSTATE DENTAL AND DENTAL
HYGIENE COMPACT LICENSURE COMMISSION CREATED PURSUANT TO SECTION 3
OF THIS ACT;
(K) “COMMISSIONERS” MEANS THE TWO (2) MEMBERS CHOSEN BY EACH
MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD TO SERVE AS THE VOTING MEMBERS OF THE
COMMISSION;
(L) “COMPACT” MEANS THE INTERSTATE DENTAL AND DENTAL HYGIENE
LICENSURE COMPACT CREATED PURSUANT TO SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT;
(M) “COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE” MEANS THE EXPEDITED DENTAL OR
DENTAL HYGIENE LICENSE TO PRACTICE IN A MEMBER STATE THAT IS NOT THE
LICENSEE’S HOME STATE;
(N) “CONVICTION” MEANS AN ADJUDICATION OR FORMAL JUDGMENT BY A
COURT THAT AN INDIVIDUAL IS GUILTY THROUGH A PLEA OF GUILTY OR NO
CONTEST, OR A FINDING OF GUILT BY THE COURT. EVIDENCE OF A CONVICTION OF
A CRIMINAL OFFENSE BY A COURT SHALL BE CONSIDERED FINAL FOR THE
PURPOSES OF CONSIDERING OR IMPOSING DISCIPLINARY ACTION BY A MEMBER
STATE DENTAL BOARD;
(O) “CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECK” MEANS A CRIMINAL BACKGROUND
CHECK USING THE RESULTS OF FINGERPRINT OR OTHER BIOMETRIC DATA CHECKS
COMPLIANT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF

SENATE BILL 538 5
INVESTIGATION, WITH THE EXCEPTION OF FEDERAL EMPLOYEES WHO HAVE
SUITABILITY DETERMINATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH 5 C.F.R. 731.202;
(P) “DENTAL HYGIENIST” MEANS ANY PERSON WHO:
1. HAS SUCCESSFULLY GRADUATED FROM A CODA–APPROVED
DENTAL HYGIENE SCHOOL;
2. HAS SUCCESSFULLY PASSED THE ADEX DENTAL HYGIENE
LICENSURE EXAMINATION, OR HAS BEEN IN PRACTICE 5 YEARS OR MORE AND HAS
SUCCESSFULLY PASSED A REGIONAL BOARD EXAMINATION OR EQUIVALENT
STATE–ADMINISTERED PSYCHOMOTOR LICENSURE EXAMINATION PRIOR TO
JANUARY 1, 2024;
3. HAS SUCCESSFULLY PASSED THE WRITTEN NATIONAL DENTAL
HYGIENE BOARD EXAMINATION ADMINISTERED BY THE JOINT COMMISSION ON
NATIONAL DENTAL EXAMINATIONS;
4. POSSESSES A FULL AND UNRESTRICTED DENTAL HYGIENE
LICENSE ISSUED BY A MEMBER STATE;
5. HAS NEVER BEEN CONVICTED OR RECEIVED ADJUDICATION,
DEFERRED ADJUDICATION, COMMUNITY SUPERVISION OR DEFERRED DISPOSITION
FOR ANY OFFENSE (OTHER THAN TRAFFIC OFFENSES) BY A COURT OF APPROPRIATE
JURISDICTION;
6. HAS NEVER BEEN A SUBJECT OF DISCIPLINE BY A LICENSING
AGENCY THROUGH ANY ADVERSE ACTION, ORDER, OR OTHER RESTRICTION OF THE
LICENSEE BY A LICENSING AGENCY, WITH THE EXCEPTION OF FAILURE TO PAY
FEES OR FAILURE TO COMPLETE CONTINUING EDUCATION;
7. IS NOT CURRENTLY UNDER ACTIVE INVESTIGATION BY A
LICENSING AGENCY OR LAW ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY IN ANY STATE, FEDERAL
OR FOREIGN JURISDICTION; AND
8. MEETS ANY JURISPRUDENCE REQUIREMENT ESTABLISHED BY A
MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD OF A MEMBER STATE IN WHICH A LICENSEE IS
SEEKING A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE.
(Q) “DENTAL PRACTICE ACT” MEANS THE LAWS AND REGULATIONS
GOVERNING THE PRACTICE OF DENTISTRY WITHIN A MEMBER STATE;
(R) “DENTIST” MEANS ANY PERSON WHO:

SENATE BILL 538
1. HAS SUCCESSFULLY GRADUATED FROM A CODA–APPROVED
DENTAL SCHOOL;
2. HAS SUCCESSFULLY PASSED THE ADEX DENTAL LICENSURE
EXAM; OR HAS BEEN IN PRACTICE 5 YEARS OR MORE AND HAS SUCCESSFULLY
PASSED A REGIONAL BOARD EXAMINATION OR EQUIVALENT STATE–ADMINISTERED
PSYCHOMOTOR LICENSURE EXAMINATION PRIOR TO JANUARY 1, 2024;
3. HAS SUCCESSFULLY PASSED THE WRITTEN NATIONAL DENTAL
BOARD EXAM ADMINISTERED BY THE JOINT COMMISSION ON NATIONAL DENTAL
EXAMINATIONS;
4. POSSESSES A FULL AND UNRESTRICTED DENTAL LICENSE ISSUED
BY A MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD;
5. HAS NEVER BEEN CONVICTED OR RECEIVED ADJUDICATION,
DEFERRED ADJUDICATION, COMMUNITY SUPERVISION, OR DEFERRED DISPOSITION
FOR ANY OFFENSE (OTHER THAN TRAFFIC OFFENSES) BY A COURT OF APPROPRIATE
JURISDICTION;
6. HAS NEVER BEEN A SUBJECT OF DISCIPLINE BY A LICENSING
AGENCY THROUGH ANY ADVERSE ACTION, ORDER, OR OTHER RESTRICTION OF THE
LICENSEE BY A LICENSING AGENCY, WITH THE EXCEPTION OF FAILURE TO PAY
FEES OR FAILURE TO COMPLETE CONTINUING EDUCATION;
7. HAS NEVER HAD A STATE OR FEDERAL DRUG REGISTRATION,
PERMIT, OR LICENSE RESTRICTED, SUSPENDED, OR REVOKED BY THE UNITED
STATES DRUG ENFORCEMENT ADMINISTRATION OR ANY LICENSING AGENCY THAT
OVERSEES SCHEDULED DRUG REGISTRATIONS;
8. IS NOT CURRENTLY UNDER ACTIVE INVESTIGATION BY A
LICENSING AGENCY OR LAW ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY IN ANY STATE, FEDERAL
OR FOREIGN JURISDICTION; AND
9. MEETS ANY JURISPRUDENCE REQUIREMENT ESTABLISHED BY A
MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD IN WHICH A LICENSEE IS SEEKING A COMPACT
LICENSE PRIVILEGE;
(S) “HOME STATE” MEANS THE STATE OF PRIMARY LICENSURE OF A
LICENSEE;

SENATE BILL 538 7
(T) “LICENSE” MEANS THE AUTHORIZATION BY A LICENSING AUTHORITY
FOR A DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST TO ENGAGE IN THE UNRESTRICTED
PRACTICE OF DENTISTRY OR DENTAL HYGIENE, WHICH WOULD BE UNLAWFUL
WITHOUT SUCH LICENSE;
(U) “LICENSEE” MEANS A DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST WHO HOLDS AN
UNRESTRICTED LICENSE TO PRACTICE AS A DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST;
(V) “LICENSING AGENCY” MEANS THE AGENCY OR OTHER ENTITY OF A
STATE THAT IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE LICENSING OF DENTISTS AND DENTAL
HYGIENISTS. IF A MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD HAS SUCH RESPONSIBILITY, IT
SHALL BE DEEMED A LICENSING AGENCY;
(W) “MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD” MEANS A STATE AGENCY IN A
MEMBER STATE THAT PROTECTS THE PUBLIC THROUGH LICENSURE, REGULATION,
AND THE EDUCATION OF DENTISTS AND DENTAL HYGIENISTS, AS DIRECTED BY THE
STATE LAW. ALL ACTIONS TAKEN BY A MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD SHALL BE
UNDER THE AUTHORITY OF THE LAWS OF ITS STATE AND ANY OTHER RIGHTS
CONFERRED UNDER THIS COMPACT;
(X) “MEMBER STATE” MEANS A STATE, THE DISTRICT OF COLOMBIA OR
ANY OTHER UNITED STATES TERRITORY THAT HAS ENACTED THE COMPACT;
(Y) “REGIONAL BOARD EXAMINATION” MEANS INITIAL LICENSURE
EXAMINATIONS ADMINISTERED BY THE WESTERN REGIONAL EXAMINING BOARD
(WREB), THE NORTH EAST REGIONAL BOARD OF DENTAL EXAMINERS (NERB),
THE COMMISSION ON DENTAL COMPETENCY ASSESSMENTS (CDCA), COUNCIL OF
INTERSTATE TESTING AGENCIES (CITA), SOUTHERN REGIONAL TESTING AGENCY
(SRTA), OR CENTRAL REGIONAL DENTAL TESTING SERVICES (CRDTS) THAT
ASSESS PSYCHOMOTOR SKILLS.
(Z) “REPOSITORY” MEANS THE REPOSITORY OF ORIGINAL DOCUMENTS OF
A LICENSEE THAT MAY INCLUDE ORIGINAL TRANSCRIPTS, CERTIFICATION
DOCUMENTS, TEST SCORES, MILITARY TRAINING RECORDS, PREVIOUS OR CURRENT
LICENSING DOCUMENTS AND OTHER SOURCES OF MATERIALS NEEDED FOR
APPLICATIONS AND VERIFICATION ADMINISTERED BY THE AADB OR ITS
SUCCESSOR. THE REPOSITORY SHALL RECEIVE DOCUMENTS FROM PRIMARY OR
ORIGINATING SOURCES AND/OR VERIFY THEIR AUTHENTICITY;
(AA) “SCOPE OF PRACTICE” MEANS THE DENTAL–RELATED PROCEDURES
THAT REQUIRE A LICENSE, PERMIT, OR TRAINING, TO UNDERTAKE THE TREATMENT
AND PROCEDURE TO BE COMPLETED ON A PATIENT WITHIN THE MEMBER STATE’S
REQUIREMENTS;

SENATE BILL 538
(BB) “STATE” MEANS A STATE WITHIN THE UNITED STATES OR A UNITED
STATES TERRITORY; AND
(CC) “STATE JURISPRUDENCE” MEANS THE KNOWLEDGE OF A MEMBER
STATE’S LAWS AND RULES OF DENTISTRY AND DENTAL HYGIENE.
SECTION 3. COMPACT AND COMMISSION
(A) THE MEMBER STATES HEREBY CREATE THE INTERSTATE DENTAL AND
DENTAL HYGIENE LICENSURE COMPACT AND THE COMMISSION. EACH MEMBER
STATE MUST ENACT A COMPACT THAT IS NOT MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM THIS
COMPACT, AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION.
(B) EACH MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD SHALL HAVE TWO (2) VOTING
MEMBERS WHO SHALL SERVE AS COMMISSIONERS. EACH COMMISSIONER SHALL
HAVE ONE (1) VOTE. MEMBER STATES WITH SEPARATE DENTAL AND DENTAL
HYGIENE LICENSING AGENCIES SHALL APPOINT ONE (1) COMMISSIONER FROM
EACH LICENSING AGENCY. ONE COMMISSIONER SHALL BE A CURRENT MEMBER OF
A MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD. COMMISSIONERS MAY NOT DELEGATE VOTES
OR VOTE BY PROXY, HOWEVER, IF A COMMISSIONER IS UNABLE TO ATTEND, THE
MEMBER STATE MAY SUBSTITUTE A COMMISSIONER WHO MEETS THE SAME
REQUIREMENTS.
(C) UPON FIVE (5) STATES JOINING THE COMPACT, THE COMPACT SHALL
BECOME ACTIVE. THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT BYLAWS UPON BECOMING
ACTIVE.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST ONCE PER CALENDAR YEAR
(THE “ANNUAL MEETING”) AND AT ADDITIONAL TIMES AS NECESSARY PURSUANT
TO THE BYLAWS AND RULES.
(E) AT EACH ANNUAL MEETING, THE COMMISSION SHALL ELECT A CHAIR,
VICE CHAIR, SECRETARY, AND TREASURER FROM THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE
COMMISSION (THE “OFFICERS”). THE OFFICERS SHALL BE MEMBERS OF THE
COMMISSION’S EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE (THE “EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE”). THE
COMMISSION SHALL ALSO ELECT REPRESENTATIVES FROM FOUR REGIONAL
DISTRICTS ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION TO SERVE ON THE EXECUTIVE
COMMITTEE. ALL OFFICERS AND EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE REPRESENTATIVES
SHALL SERVE ONE (1)–YEAR TERMS.
(F) QUORUM FOR PURPOSES OF CONDUCTING BUSINESS SHALL BE A
MAJORITY OF COMMISSIONERS ATTENDING IN PERSON OR VIRTUALLY.

SENATE BILL 538 9
(G) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF ALL MEETINGS ON ITS
WEBSITE AND IN OTHER COMMUNICATIONS TO MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARDS.
(H) A VOTE OF TWO–THIRDS (2/3) OF THE COMMISSIONERS PRESENT SHALL
BE REQUIRED FOR AN EXECUTIVE SESSION TO DISCUSS:
1. ITEMS SPECIFICALLY RELATED TO PARTICIPATION IN A LAWSUIT
OR IN ANTICIPATION OF A LEGAL PROCEEDING;
2. MATTERS SPECIFICALLY EXEMPTED FROM DISCLOSURE BY
FEDERAL STATUTE;
3. INFORMATION OR MATTERS INVOLVING LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCIES OR INFORMATION THAT ACCUSES A PERSON OF A CRIME OR A PUBLIC
CENSURE;
4. DISCUSSIONS THAT WOULD INCLUDE INFORMATION OF A
PERSONAL NATURE THAT WOULD CONSTITUTE AN UNWARRANTED INVASION OF
PERSONAL PRIVACY;
5. ANYTHING CONSIDERED INTERNAL PRACTICES AND
PROCEDURES OR A TRADE SECRET;
6. OTHER ITEMS DESCRIBED IN THE COMMISSION BYLAWS
ALLOWING FOR EXECUTIVE SESSIONS TO BE CALLED; OR
7. ADVICE OF LEGAL COUNSEL.
(I) THE COMMISSION SHALL KEEP MINUTES AND MAKE THEM AVAILABLE
TO ALL MEMBER STATES.
(J) THE COMMISSION MAY ESTABLISH OTHER COMMITTEES AS NEEDED.
(K) THE COMMISSION SHALL PREPARE AN ANNUAL REPORT THAT SHALL BE
MADE AVAILABLE TO THE LEGISLATURES AND GOVERNORS OF THE MEMBER
STATES. THE ANNUAL REPORT SHALL DESCRIBE THE ACTIVITIES OF THE
COMMISSION DURING THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR. SUCH REPORTS SHALL
ALSO INCLUDE REPORTS OF THE ANNUAL FINANCIAL AUDIT AND ANY ACTIONS
TAKEN BY OR RULES THAT WERE ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION.
SECTION 4. DUTIES OF COMPACT MEMBER STATES

SENATE BILL 538
(A) MEMBER STATES SHALL SUBMIT TO THE CLEARINGHOUSE ALL
MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD ACTIONS AND OTHER DOCUMENTS AND DATA AS
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION;
(B) MEMBER STATES SHALL NOTIFY THE COMMISSION OF ANY ADVERSE
ACTION TAKEN BY THE MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD, ANY ACTIVE
INVESTIGATION BY THE MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD, ANY ACTIVE
INVESTIGATION INVOLVING PENDING CRIMINAL CHARGES, OR OTHER
CIRCUMSTANCE AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION;
(C) ANY ADVERSE ACTION, ORDER, RESTRICTION OR DENIAL OF A LICENSE
OR PERMIT ON A LICENSEE OR COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE HOLDER SHALL BE
REPORTED TO THE CLEARINGHOUSE BY THE MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD;
(D) MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARDS MAY SUBMIT TO THE
CLEARINGHOUSE NONPUBLIC COMPLAINTS, OR DISCIPLINARY OR INVESTIGATORY
INFORMATION NOT REQUIRED BY SECTION 4(C). ALL INVESTIGATORY MATERIAL
SHALL BE CONSIDERED CONFIDENTIAL AND NOT PART OF A PUBLIC RECORD
UNLESS OTHERWISE SPECIFICALLY REQUIRED BY STATE STATUTE;
(E) MEMBER STATES SHALL ACCEPT CONTINUING EDUCATION CREDITS AS
REQUIRED OR RECOGNIZED BY ANY OTHER MEMBER STATE;
(F) DOCUMENTS IN THE REPOSITORY SHALL BE TREATED BY A MEMBER
STATE AS THE EQUIVALENT OF A PRIMARY OR ORIGINAL SOURCE DOCUMENT FOR
LICENSURE;
(G) MEMBER STATES SHALL ACCEPT A STANDARDIZED APPLICATION FOR A
COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE. THE STANDARDIZED APPLICATION SHALL BE
ESTABLISHED BY THE RULES ENACTED BY THE COMMISSION;
(H) MEMBER STATES MAY AGREE TO SHARE INFORMATION REGARDING
ONGOING INVESTIGATIONS AND ACTIONS, INCLUDING JOINT INVESTIGATIONS
BETWEEN STATES. ALL INVESTIGATORY MATERIAL SHALL BE CONSIDERED
CONFIDENTIAL AND NOT PART OF A PUBLIC RECORD UNLESS OTHERWISE
SPECIFICALLY REQUIRED BY STATE STATUTE; AND
(I) AS PART OF THE COMPACT ENFORCEMENT, PARTICIPATING MEMBER
STATES MAY ISSUE SUBPOENAS AND SEEK TESTIMONY OF WITNESSES, WHICH
SUBPOENAS SHALL BE ENFORCED IN OTHER MEMBER STATES AND ENFORCED BY A
COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION WHERE THE WITNESSES OR EVIDENCE IS
LOCATED.

SENATE BILL 538 11
SECTION 5. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE COMMISSION
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE DUTY AND POWER TO:
1. OVERSEE AND MAINTAIN THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE
COMPACT, INCLUDING THE ORGANIZATIONAL NEEDS, THE FINANCIAL ACTIVITIES,
THE HIRING OF PERSONNEL AND ONGOING ACTIVITIES OR NEEDS OF THE
COMMISSION;
2. PROMULGATE BYLAWS AND RULES TO OPERATE THE COMPACT
AND THE COMMISSION;
3. ESTABLISH A BUDGET AND MAKE EXPENDITURES;
4. HAVE AN ANNUAL FINANCIAL AUDIT PERFORMED BY AN
INDEPENDENT CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM;
5. ISSUE, UPON THE REQUEST OF A MEMBER STATE DENTAL
BOARD, ADVISORY OPINIONS CONCERNING THE MEANING OR INTERPRETATION OF
THE COMPACT AND ITS BYLAWS, RULES, AND ACTIONS;
6. ENFORCE COMPLIANCE WITH COMPACT PROVISIONS, THE RULES
PROMULGATED BY THE COMMISSION, AND THE BYLAWS, USING ALL NECESSARY
AND PROPER MEANS, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE USE OF JUDICIAL
PROCESS;
7. HOLD AN ANNUAL MEETING FOR THE COMMISSION WHERE THE
ELECTIONS OF THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE AND OTHER ISSUES MAY BE DISCUSSED
AND VOTED ON;
8. ESTABLISH PERSONNEL POLICIES AND PROGRAMS RELATING TO
CONFLICTS OF INTEREST, AND THE RATES OF COMPENSATION AND QUALIFICATIONS
OF PERSONNEL;
9. ACCEPT DONATIONS AND GRANTS OF MONEY, EQUIPMENT,
SUPPLIES, MATERIALS AND SERVICES, AND TO RECEIVE, UTILIZE AND DISPOSE OF
THEM IN A MANNER CONSISTENT WITH THE CONFLICT–OF–INTEREST POLICIES
ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION;
10. REPORT ANNUALLY TO THE LEGISLATURES AND GOVERNORS OF
THE MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARDS CONCERNING THE ACTIVITIES OF THE
COMMISSION DURING THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR. SUCH REPORTS SHALL
ALSO INCLUDE REPORTS OF ANNUAL FINANCIAL AUDITS, ALL ACTIONS OF THE

SENATE BILL 538
COMMISSION, RULES ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION, AND ANY RECOMMENDATIONS
BY THE COMMISSION; AND
11. COORDINATE EDUCATION, TRAINING AND PUBLIC AWARENESS
REGARDING THE COMPACT, ITS IMPLEMENTATION, AND ITS OPERATION.
(B) THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL HAVE THE POWER TO ACT ON
BEHALF OF THE COMMISSION, WITH THE EXCEPTION OF RULEMAKING, DURING
PERIODS WHEN THE COMMISSION IS NOT IN SESSION. WHEN ACTING ON BEHALF OF
THE COMMISSION, THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL OVERSEE THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THE COMPACT, INCLUDING ENFORCEMENT OF AND
COMPLIANCE WITH THE COMPACT.
(C) THE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE
IMMUNE FROM SUIT AND LIABILITY, EITHER PERSONALLY OR IN THEIR OFFICIAL
CAPACITY, FOR A CLAIM FOR DAMAGE TO OR LOSS OF PROPERTY OR PERSONAL
INJURY OR OTHER CIVIL LIABILITY CAUSED OR ARISING OUT OF, OR RELATING TO,
AN ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR OR OMISSION THAT OCCURRED, OR THAT SUCH
PERSON HAD A REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED, WITHIN THE SCOPE
OF COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES OR RESPONSIBILITIES; PROVIDED, THAT
SUCH PERSON SHALL NOT BE PROTECTED FROM SUIT OR LIABILITY FOR DAMAGE,
LOSS, INJURY OR LIABILITY CAUSED BY THE INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL AND
WANTON MISCONDUCT OF SUCH PERSON.
(D) THE LIABILITY OF THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND EMPLOYEES OF THE
COMMISSION OR REPRESENTATIVES OF THE COMMISSION, ACTING WITHIN THE
SCOPE OF SUCH PERSON’S EMPLOYMENT OR DUTIES FOR ACTS, ERRORS OR
OMISSIONS OCCURRING WITHIN SUCH PERSON’S STATE MAY NOT EXCEED THE
LIMITS OF LIABILITY SET FORTH UNDER THE CONSTITUTION AND LAWS OF THAT
STATE FOR STATE OFFICIALS, EMPLOYEES AND AGENTS. THE COMMISSION SHALL
BE CONSIDERED TO BE AN INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE STATES FOR THE PURPOSES
OF ANY SUCH ACTION. NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO
PROTECT SUCH PERSON FROM SUIT OR LIABILITY FOR DAMAGE, LOSS, INJURY OR
LIABILITY CAUSED BY THE INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL AND WANTON MISCONDUCT
OF SUCH PERSON.
(E) THE COMMISSION SHALL DEFEND THE COMMISSION’S EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR, ITS EMPLOYEES, AND, SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL OR OTHER APPROPRIATE LEGAL COUNSEL OF THE MEMBER STATE
REPRESENTED BY A COMMISSION REPRESENTATIVE, SHALL DEFEND SUCH
COMMISSION REPRESENTATIVE IN ANY CIVIL ACTION SEEKING TO IMPOSE
LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF AN ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR OR OMISSION THAT
OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES OR

SENATE BILL 538 13
RESPONSIBILITIES, OR THAT THE DEFENDANT HAD A REASONABLE BASIS FOR
BELIEVING OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES
OR RESPONSIBILITIES, PROVIDED THAT THE ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR OR
OMISSION DID NOT RESULT FROM INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL AND WANTON
MISCONDUCT ON THE PART OF SUCH PERSON.
(F) TO THE EXTENT NOT COVERED BY THE STATE INVOLVED, MEMBER
STATE, OR THE COMMISSION, THE REPRESENTATIVES OR EMPLOYEES OF THE
COMMISSION SHALL BE HELD HARMLESS BY THE COMMISSION IN THE AMOUNT OF
A SETTLEMENT OR JUDGMENT, INCLUDING ATTORNEY FEES AND COSTS, OBTAINED
AGAINST SUCH PERSONS ARISING OUT OF AN ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR OR
OMISSION THAT OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT,
DUTIES OR RESPONSIBILITIES, OR THAT SUCH PERSONS HAD A REASONABLE BASIS
FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT,
DUTIES OR RESPONSIBILITIES, PROVIDED THAT THE ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT,
ERROR OR OMISSION DID NOT RESULT FROM INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL AND
WANTON MISCONDUCT ON THE PART OF SUCH PERSONS.
SECTION 6. APPLICATION, ELIGIBILITY, AND ISSUANCE OF COMPACT LICENSE
PRIVILEGE TO A MEMBER STATE
(A) A DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST APPLYING FOR COMPACT LICENSE
PRIVILEGES SHALL MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF A DENTIST AS LISTED IN SECTION
(2)(R) OF THIS COMPACT OR A DENTAL HYGIENIST AS LISTED IN SECTION (2)(P) OF
THIS COMPACT AND HOLD A CURRENT LICENSE IN A MEMBER STATE UNDER THIS
COMPACT.
(B) EACH DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST SHALL DESIGNATE A HOME
STATE OF LICENSURE. THE HOME STATE SHALL BE DETERMINED BY:
(1) THE STATE OF PRIMARY RESIDENCE FOR THE DENTIST OR
DENTAL HYGIENIST, WHERE 25% OF THEIR PRACTICE WITHIN ONE YEAR OCCURS.
AN ACTIVE–DUTY MILITARY MEMBER OR THEIR SPOUSE MAY CHOOSE A HOME
STATE AS DESIGNATED WITH THE MILITARY BUT ARE NOT REQUIRED TO MEET THE
REQUIREMENT OF 25% PRACTICE BEING WITHIN THEIR HOME STATE; OR
(2) IF NO STATE QUALIFIES UNDER SECTION 6(B)(1), THEN THE
STATE THAT THE DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST LISTED AS THEIR STATE OF
RESIDENCE ON THE PREVIOUS YEAR’S FEDERAL TAX RETURN.
(C) A DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST MAY REDESIGNATE A HOME STATE
NO MORE THAN ONE TIME IN A CALENDAR YEAR IF THE QUALIFICATIONS OF A HOME
STATE ARE MET.

SENATE BILL 538
(D) A DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST SEEKING A COMPACT LICENSE
PRIVILEGE (THE “APPLICANT”) SHALL APPLY TO THEIR HOME STATE DENTAL
BOARD FOR A LETTER STATING THAT THE APPLICANT IS ELIGIBLE FOR COMPACT
LICENSE PRIVILEGES.
(E) THE HOME STATE DENTAL BOARD SHALL DETERMINE THE ELIGIBILITY
OF AN APPLICATION FOR A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE AND SHALL ISSUE A
LETTER OF APPROVAL OR DENIAL OF THE APPLICATION FOR A COMPACT LICENSE
PRIVILEGE.
(F) THE LETTER FROM THE APPLICANT’S HOME STATE DENTAL BOARD
APPROVING THE APPLICATION SHALL BE SUBMITTED TO THE MEMBER STATE
DENTAL BOARD FOR THE MEMBER STATE IN WHICH THE APPLICANT PROPOSES TO
PRACTICE, AND SHALL INCLUDE: (I) THE COMPACT APPLICATION PACKET; (II)
AUTHORIZATION TO SEEK ACCESS TO THE APPLICANT’S REPOSITORY DOCUMENTS;
(III) ANY ADDITIONAL INFORMATION THAT MAY BE REQUIRED BY THE PROPOSED
COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE STATE; AND (IV) ANY REQUIRED FEES. THE MEMBER
STATE DENTAL BOARD SHALL REVIEW THE APPLICATION TO CONFIRM
COMPLIANCE WITH THE MEMBER STATE’S LAWS AND REGULATIONS. FOLLOWING
SUCH REVIEW, IF THE MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD APPROVES THE
APPLICATION, IT SHALL ISSUE A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE FROM THE
PROPOSED MEMBER STATE TO THE APPLICANT.
(G) APPEALS OF A DENIAL OF A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE
APPLICATION SHALL BE FILED WITH THE MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD MAKING
SUCH DETERMINATION, AND SHALL BE FILED WITHIN THIRTY (30) DAYS OF THE
DATE OF THE DENIAL.
(H) A LICENSEE HOLDING A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE SHALL NOTIFY
THE COMMISSION WITHIN TEN (10) BUSINESS DAYS OF ANY ADVERSE ACTION
TAKEN AGAINST A LICENSE HELD IN A STATE THAT IS NOT A MEMBER STATE.
(I) A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE MAY BE REVOKED, SUSPENDED OR
LIMITED BY THE ISSUING MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD IF AT ANY TIME THE
LICENSEE’S HOME STATE LICENSE IS REVOKED, SUSPENDED OR LIMITED.
(J) THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE RULES ON THE DURATION OF A
COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE, THE APPLICATION AND RENEWAL PROCESS FOR A
COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE, AND ANY APPLICATION FEES.

SENATE BILL 538 15
(K) ELIGIBILITY OR INELIGIBILITY TO RECEIVE A COMPACT LICENSE
PRIVILEGE SHALL NOT LIMIT THE ABILITY OF A LICENSEE TO SEEK A STATE
LICENSE THROUGH THE REGULAR PROCESS OUTSIDE OF THE COMPACT.
SECTION 7. JURISDICTION OVER COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE HOLDERS
(A) EACH LICENSEE HOLDING A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE SHALL BE
SUBJECT TO AND COMPLY WITH THE LAWS AND REGULATIONS OF THE MEMBER
STATE IN WHICH SUCH LICENSEE PRACTICES UNDER A COMPACT LICENSE
PRIVILEGE.
(B) EACH LICENSEE HOLDING A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE SHALL BE
SUBJECT TO THE JURISDICTION AND AUTHORITY OF THE MEMBER STATE DENTAL
BOARD OF THE STATE IN WHICH SUCH LICENSEE PRACTICES, AS IF THEY HELD A
LICENSE ISSUED FROM SUCH MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD. SUCH COMPACT
LICENSE PRIVILEGE HOLDER SHALL BE DEEMED A “LICENSEE” OF THE MEMBER
STATE DENTAL BOARD FOR PURPOSES OF SUCH BOARD TAKING AN ADVERSE
ACTION.
(C) EACH LICENSEE HOLDING A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE SHALL LIST
A CURRENT ADDRESS WITH THE COMMISSION THAT SHALL SERVE AS THEIR
OFFICIAL ADDRESS OF SERVICE.
(D) A LICENSEE HOLDING A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE MAY HAVE AN
ADVERSE ACTION TAKEN AGAINST THEM BY:
(1) THE MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD OF THE MEMBER STATE IN
WHICH THEY ARE PRACTICING WITH A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE;
(2) THE LICENSEE’S HOME STATE; OR
(3) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY OF A STATE THAT IS NOT A
MEMBER STATE FROM WHICH THE LICENSEE HOLDS A LICENSE.
(E) A HOME STATE MAY TAKE AN ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST THE HOLDER
OF A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE, REGARDLESS OF WHERE THE ACTIONS GIVING
RISE TO THE ADVERSE ACTION OCCURRED.
(F) ANY MEMBER STATE IN WHICH THE COMPACT LICENSEE HOLDS A
COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE MAY INVESTIGATE AN ALLEGATION OF A VIOLATION
OF THE LAWS AND RULES OF THE PRACTICE OF DENTISTRY OR DENTAL HYGIENE IN
ANY OTHER STATE WHERE THE COMPACT LICENSEE HOLDS A COMPACT LICENSE
PRIVILEGE.

SENATE BILL 538
SECTION 8. FEES AND MILITARY WAIVER
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE RULES REGARDING THE USE OF THE
REPOSITORY BY EACH HOLDER OF A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE.
(B) A MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD ISSUING A COMPACT LICENSE
PRIVILEGE AUTHORIZING PRACTICE IN ITS STATE MAY IMPOSE A FEE FOR A
COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE, FOR EITHER INITIAL ISSUANCE OR ANY RENEWAL.
(C) NO COMPACT FEE SHALL BE REQUIRED OF ANY ACTIVE–DUTY MILITARY
MEMBER AND/OR THEIR SPOUSE UP TO ONE (1) YEAR AFTER SEPARATION FROM THE
SERVICE. EACH MEMBER STATE ISSUING A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE MAY
WAIVE FEES FOR ACTIVE–DUTY MILITARY AND/OR THEIR SPOUSE AS REQUIRED BY
EACH INDIVIDUAL STATE STATUTE.
(D) ACTIVE–DUTY MILITARY MAY TRANSFER MILITARY TRAINING RECORDS
TO THE REPOSITORY WITHOUT A FEE.
SECTION 9. JOINT INVESTIGATIONS AND DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS
(A) EACH MEMBER STATE SHALL NAME A POINT OF CONTACT FOR JOINT
INVESTIGATIONS BETWEEN MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARDS.
(B) MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARDS MAY PARTICIPATE WITH OTHER
MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARDS IN JOINT INVESTIGATIONS OF LICENSEES THAT
ARE SUBJECT TO THIS COMPACT.
(C) MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARDS MAY SHARE INVESTIGATIVE,
LITIGATION OR OTHER MATERIALS IN FURTHERANCE OF ANY JOINT OR INDIVIDUAL
INVESTIGATION OF A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE HOLDER.
(D) A SUBPOENA ISSUED BY A MEMBER STATE OR MEMBER STATE DENTAL
BOARD SHALL BE ENFORCEABLE IN OTHER MEMBER STATES AS ALLOWED BY LAW.
(E) IF A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE HOLDER HAS AN ADVERSE ACTION
TAKEN AGAINST THEM BY ANY MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD, THE COMPACT
LICENSE PRIVILEGE HOLDER SHALL AUTOMATICALLY BE SUBJECT TO SIMILAR
DISCIPLINE BY OTHER MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARDS.
(F) IF A COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE HOLDER HAS AN ADVERSE ACTION
TAKEN AGAINST THEIR HOME STATE LICENSE, INCLUDING BEING REVOKED,
SURRENDERED, OR RELINQUISHED IN LIEU OF DISCIPLINE OR SUSPENDED, THEN

SENATE BILL 538 17
AUTOMATICALLY ALL OTHER COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGES SHALL BE PLACED IN
THE SAME STATUS. THE HOME STATE DENTAL BOARD SHALL NOTIFY THE
COMMISSION AND THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE A NOTICE TO ALL MEMBER STATE
DENTAL BOARDS OF SUCH ADVERSE ACTION.
(G) IF DISCIPLINE OR AN ADVERSE ACTION IS TAKEN AGAINST A COMPACT
LICENSE PRIVILEGE HOLDER IN A MEMBER STATE, THE MEMBER STATE DENTAL
BOARD SHALL NOTIFY THE COMMISSION AND THE HOME STATE OF THE COMPACT
LICENSE PRIVILEGE HOLDER. THE HOME STATE MAY DEEM THE ACTION
CONCLUSIVE AS A MATTER OF LAW AND FACT AND MAY:
(1) IMPOSE THE SAME OR LESSER SANCTION CONSISTENT WITH THE
HOME STATE’S LAWS; OR
(2) PURSUE SEPARATE ACTIONS AGAINST THE COMPACT LICENSE
PRIVILEGE HOLDER UNDER ITS LAWS, REGARDLESS OF THE SANCTIONS PURSUED
BY THE MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARD.
SECTION 10. OTHER REQUESTS FOR INFORMATION FROM THE REPOSITORY AND
THE CLEARINGHOUSE
(A) INSURANCE COMPANIES AND ENTITIES VERIFYING DOCUMENTS FOR
THE PURPOSE OF LICENSES EXTENDED TO A DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST MAY
SEEK INFORMATION FROM THE CLEARINGHOUSE FOR PUBLIC RECORD
DOCUMENTS.
(B) A DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST MAY SUBMIT A REQUEST TO THE
COMMISSION TO ALLOW ANY HIRING EMPLOYER, ENTITY, OR INSURANCE COMPANY
TO ACCESS DOCUMENTS FROM THE REPOSITORY FOR THE PURPOSES OF
CREDENTIALING, LICENSING OR OTHER PRIVILEGES.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL SET A FEE SCHEDULE FOR THESE SERVICES.
SECTION 11. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE COMMISSION
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE REASONABLE RULES IN ORDER
TO EFFECTIVELY AND EFFICIENTLY IMPLEMENT AND ACHIEVE THE PURPOSES AND
ADMINISTRATION OF THE COMPACT. NOTWITHSTANDING THE FOREGOING, IN THE
EVENT THE COMMISSION EXERCISES ITS RULEMAKING AUTHORITY IN A MANNER
THAT IS BEYOND THE SCOPE OF THE PURPOSES OF THE COMPACT OR THE POWERS
GRANTED HEREUNDER, THEN SUCH AN ACTION BY THE COMMISSION MAY BE
DETERMINED TO BE INVALID AND HAVE NO FORCE OR EFFECT.

SENATE BILL 538
(B) RULES VALIDLY ISSUED BY THE COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE FORCE
OF LAW IN EACH MEMBER STATE.
(C) RULES DEEMED APPROPRIATE FOR THE OPERATIONS OF THE
COMMISSION SHALL BE MADE PURSUANT TO A RULEMAKING PROCESS THAT
SUBSTANTIALLY CONFORMS TO THE MODEL STATE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE
ACT OF 2010, AND SUBSEQUENT AMENDMENTS THERETO.
SECTION 12. OVERSIGHT OF THE COMPACT
(A) THE EXECUTIVE, LEGISLATIVE, AND JUDICIAL BRANCHES OF STATE
GOVERNMENT IN EACH MEMBER STATE SHALL ENFORCE THE COMPACT AND SHALL
TAKE ALL ACTIONS NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE TO EFFECTUATE THE
COMPACT’S PURPOSES AND INTENT TO ALLOW FOR EXPEDITED LICENSURE FOR THE
PURPOSE OF MOBILITY. THE PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT AND THE RULES
PROMULGATED HEREUNDER SHALL HAVE STANDING AS STATUTORY LAW BUT SHALL
NOT OVERRIDE EXISTING STATE AUTHORITY TO REGULATE THE PRACTICE OF
DENTISTRY AND DENTAL HYGIENE.
(B) ALL COURTS MAY TAKE JUDICIAL NOTICE OF THE COMPACT AND THE
RULES IN ANY JUDICIAL OR ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDING IN A MEMBER STATE
PERTAINING TO THE SUBJECT MATTER OF THE COMPACT WHICH MAY AFFECT THE
POWERS, RESPONSIBILITIES OR ACTIONS OF THE COMMISSION.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL BE ENTITLED TO RECEIVE ALL SERVICE OF
PROCESS IN ANY SUCH PROCEEDING AND SHALL HAVE STANDING TO INTERVENE IN
THE PROCEEDING FOR ALL PURPOSES. EXCEPT WHERE THE COMMISSION HAS
INTERVENED, FAILURE TO PROVIDE SERVICE OF PROCESS TO THE COMMISSION
SHALL RENDER A JUDGMENT OR ORDER VOID AS TO THE COMMISSION, THE
COMPACT OR PROMULGATED RULES.
SECTION 13. ENFORCEMENT AND DEFAULT PROCEDURES
(A) THE COMMISSION, IN THE REASONABLE EXERCISE OF ITS DISCRETION,
SHALL ENFORCE THE PROVISIONS AND RULES OF THE COMPACT.
(B) THE GROUNDS FOR DEFAULT UNDER THIS COMPACT BY A MEMBER
STATE INCLUDE, BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO, FAILURE OF A MEMBER STATE TO
PERFORM SUCH OBLIGATIONS OR RESPONSIBILITIES IMPOSED UPON IT BY THE
COMPACT OR BY THE RULES AND BYLAWS OF THE COMMISSION PROMULGATED
UNDER THE COMPACT.

SENATE BILL 538 19
(C) IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT A MEMBER STATE HAS
DEFAULTED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF ITS OBLIGATIONS OR RESPONSIBILITIES
UNDER THE COMPACT, OR THE BYLAWS OR PROMULGATED RULES, THE
COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE DEFAULTING STATE AND
OTHER MEMBER STATES OF THE NATURE OF THE DEFAULT, THE MEANS OF CURING
THE DEFAULT AND ANY ACTION TAKEN BY THE COMMISSION. THE COMMISSION
SHALL SPECIFY THE CONDITIONS BY WHICH THE DEFAULTING STATE MUST CURE
ITS DEFAULT; AND
(2) PROVIDE REMEDIAL TRAINING AND SPECIFIC TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE REGARDING THE DEFAULT.
(D) IF THE DEFAULTING STATE FAILS TO CURE THE DEFAULT, THE
DEFAULTING STATE SHALL BE TERMINATED FROM THE COMPACT UPON AN
AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF A MAJORITY OF THE COMMISSIONERS AND ALL RIGHTS,
PRIVILEGES AND BENEFITS CONFERRED BY THE COMPACT SHALL TERMINATE ON
THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION. A CURE OF THE DEFAULT DOES NOT
RELIEVE THE OFFENDING STATE OF OBLIGATIONS OR LIABILITIES INCURRED
DURING THE PERIOD OF THE DEFAULT.
(E) TERMINATION OF MEMBERSHIP IN THE COMPACT SHALL BE IMPOSED
ONLY AFTER ALL OTHER MEANS OF SECURING COMPLIANCE HAVE BEEN
EXHAUSTED. NOTICE OF INTENT TO TERMINATE SHALL BE GIVEN BY THE
COMMISSION TO THE GOVERNOR, THE MAJORITY AND MINORITY LEADERS OF THE
DEFAULTING STATE’S LEGISLATURE AND EACH OF THE MEMBER STATES.
(F) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH RULES AND PROCEDURES TO
ADDRESS LICENSES AND COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE HOLDERS THAT ARE
MATERIALLY IMPACTED BY THE TERMINATION OF A MEMBER STATE OR THE
WITHDRAWAL OF A MEMBER STATE.
(G) THE COMMISSION SHALL NOT BEAR ANY COSTS RELATING TO ANY
STATE THAT HAS BEEN FOUND TO BE IN DEFAULT OR WHICH HAS BEEN TERMINATED
FROM THE COMPACT, UNLESS OTHERWISE MUTUALLY AGREED UPON IN WRITING
BETWEEN THE COMMISSION AND THE DEFAULTING STATE.
(H) THE DEFAULTING STATE MAY APPEAL THE ACTION OF THE COMMISSION
BY PETITIONING THE STATE COURT WHERE THE COMMISSION HAS ITS PRINCIPAL
OFFICES. THE PREVAILING PARTY SHALL BE AWARDED ALL COSTS OF SUCH
LITIGATION, INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEYS’ FEES.

SENATE BILL 538
(I) THE COMMISSION SHALL NOT BEAR ANY COSTS RELATING TO ANY
STATE THAT HAS BEEN FOUND TO BE IN DEFAULT OR WHICH HAS BEEN TERMINATED
FROM THE COMPACT, UNLESS OTHERWISE MUTUALLY AGREED UPON IN WRITING
BETWEEN THE COMMISSION AND THE DEFAULTING STATE.
(J) THE REMEDIES HEREIN SHALL NOT BE THE EXCLUSIVE REMEDIES OF
THE COMMISSION. THE COMMISSION MAY AVAIL ITSELF OF ANY OTHER REMEDIES
AVAILABLE UNDER STATE LAW OR THE REGULATION OF A PROFESSION.
SECTION 14. DISPUTE RESOLUTION
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL ATTEMPT, UPON THE REQUEST OF A MEMBER
STATE DENTAL BOARD, TO RESOLVE DISPUTES WHICH ARE SUBJECT TO THE
COMPACT AND WHICH MAY ARISE AMONG MEMBER STATE DENTAL BOARDS.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE RULES PROVIDING FOR BOTH
MEDIATION AND VOLUNTARY BINDING DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AS APPROPRIATE.
SECTION 15. MEMBER STATES, EFFECTIVE DATE, AND AMENDMENTS
(A) ANY STATE IS ELIGIBLE TO BECOME A MEMBER STATE OF THE
COMPACT.
(B) THE COMPACT SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE AND BINDING UPON
LEGISLATIVE ENACTMENT OF THE COMPACT INTO LAW BY NO LESS THAN FIVE (5)
STATES. THEREAFTER, IT SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE AND BINDING ON A STATE
UPON ENACTMENT OF THE COMPACT INTO LAW BY THAT STATE.
(C) THE GOVERNORS OF NON–MEMBER STATES, OR THEIR DESIGNEES,
SHALL BE INVITED TO PARTICIPATE IN THE ACTIVITIES OF THE COMMISSION ON A
NONVOTING BASIS PRIOR TO ADOPTION OF THE COMPACT BY ALL STATES.
(D) THE COMMISSION MAY PROPOSE AMENDMENTS TO THE COMPACT FOR
ENACTMENT BY THE MEMBER STATES. NO AMENDMENT SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE
AND BINDING UPON THE COMMISSION AND THE MEMBER STATES UNLESS AND
UNTIL IT IS ENACTED INTO LAW BY UNANIMOUS CONSENT OF THE MEMBER STATES.
SECTION 16. WITHDRAWAL
(A) ONCE EFFECTIVE, THE COMPACT SHALL CONTINUE IN FORCE AND
REMAIN BINDING UPON EACH AND EVERY MEMBER STATE; PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
THAT A MEMBER STATE MAY WITHDRAW FROM THE COMPACT AFTER GIVING

SENATE BILL 538 21
APPROPRIATE NOTICE BY SPECIFICALLY REPEALING THE STATUTE WHICH ENACTED
THE COMPACT INTO LAW.
(B) THE LICENSEE’S COMPACT LICENSE PRIVILEGE SHALL REMAIN IN
EFFECT FOR SIX (6) MONTHS FROM THE DATE OF THE MEMBER STATE DENTAL
BOARD WITHDRAWAL.
(C) THE WITHDRAWING STATE SHALL IMMEDIATELY NOTIFY THE
CHAIRPERSON OF THE COMMISSION IN WRITING UPON THE INTRODUCTION OF
LEGISLATION REPEALING THE COMPACT BY THE WITHDRAWING STATE, AND UPON
THE ENACTMENT OF SUCH LEGISLATION.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL NOTIFY THE OTHER MEMBER STATES WITHIN
SIXTY (60) DAYS OF ITS RECEIPT OF NOTICE PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 16(C) OF
THIS SECTION.
(E) REINSTATEMENT FOLLOWING WITHDRAWAL OF A MEMBER STATE
SHALL OCCUR UPON THE WITHDRAWING STATE REENACTING THE COMPACT OR
UPON SUCH LATER DATE AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION.
(F) THE COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE RULES TO ADDRESS THE IMPACT OF
THE WITHDRAWAL OF A MEMBER STATE ON LICENSES GRANTED BY OTHER
MEMBER STATES TO DENTISTS AND DENTAL HYGIENISTS WHO DESIGNATED THE
WITHDRAWING MEMBER STATE AS THEIR HOME STATE.
SECTION 17. DISSOLUTION
(A) THE COMPACT SHALL DISSOLVE EFFECTIVE UPON THE DATE OF THE
WITHDRAWAL OR DEFAULT OF THE MEMBER STATE WHICH REDUCES THE
MEMBERSHIP IN THE COMPACT TO ONE (1) MEMBER STATE.
(B) UPON THE DISSOLUTION OF THE COMPACT, THE COMPACT SHALL
BECOME NULL AND VOID AND SHALL BE OF NO FURTHER FORCE OR EFFECT, AND
THE BUSINESS AND AFFAIRS OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE CONCLUDED AND
SURPLUS FUNDS SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE BYLAWS.
SECTION 18. SEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION
(A) THE PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT SHALL BE SEVERABLE, AND IF ANY
PHRASE, CLAUSE, SENTENCE OR PROVISION IS DEEMED UNENFORCEABLE, THE
REMAINING PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT SHALL BE ENFORCEABLE.

SENATE BILL 538
(B) THE PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT SHALL BE LIBERALLY CONSTRUED
TO EFFECTUATE ITS PURPOSES.
SECTION 19. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS
(A) NOTHING HEREIN PREVENTS THE ENFORCEMENT OF ANY OTHER LAW
OF A MEMBER STATE THAT IS NOT INCONSISTENT WITH THE COMPACT.
(B) ALL LAWFUL ACTIONS OF THE COMMISSION, INCLUDING ALL RULES
AND BYLAWS PROMULGATED BY THE COMMISSION, SHALL BE BINDING UPON THE
MEMBER STATES.
(C) ALL AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE COMMISSION AND THE MEMBER
STATES SHALL BE BINDING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THEIR TERMS.
(D) IN THE EVENT ANY PROVISION OF THE COMPACT EXCEEDS THE
CONSTITUTIONAL LIMITS IMPOSED ON THE LEGISLATURE OF ANY MEMBER STATE,
SUCH PROVISION SHALL BE INEFFECTIVE TO THE EXTENT OF THE CONFLICT WITH
THE CONSTITUTIONAL PROVISION IN QUESTION IN THAT MEMBER STATE.
SECTION 20. RULES OF ORDER
THE MOST CURRENT EDITION OF THE AMERICAN INSTITUTE OF
PARLIAMENTARIANS STANDARD CODE OF PARLIAMENTARY PROCEDURE SHALL
GOVERN ALL MEETINGS OF THE COMMISSION, INCLUDING ITS COMMITTEES, IN
THOSE SITUATIONS NOT OTHERWISE COVERED IN THE BYLAWS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is contingent on the
enacting of substantially similar legislation in four other states. The Maryland Department
of Health shall notify the Department of Legislative Services within 10 days after four
states have enacted legislation that is substantially similar to this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2025.